Utah statutes.
4-2-8.3.   Agriculture Conservation Easement Account.

(1)  There is created within the General Fund a restricted account known as the Agriculture Conservation Easement Account.

(2)  The Agriculture Conservation Easement Account consists of:

(a)  grants from private foundations;

(b)  grants from local governments, the state, or the federal government;

(c)  grants from the Quality Growth Commission created under Section 11-38-201;

(d)  donations from landowners for monitoring and enforcing compliance with conservation easements;

(e)  donations from any other person; and

(f)  interest on account money.

(3)  Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the Department of Agriculture and Food shall use money from the account to monitor and enforce compliance with conservation easements held by the department.

(4)  The department may not receive or expend donations from the account to acquire conservation easements.



Enacted by Chapter 35, 2006 General Session

